Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB325.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102 of the act of June 27, 2006 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the Taxpayer Relief Act, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *12345678910111213141516171819202122 "Conspicuous." A term, written, displayed or presented in a manner that a reasonable person against which the term is to operate should have noticed. Conspicuous terms shall include the following:(1) A heading in capitals:(i) greater in size than the surrounding text; and(ii) in contrasting type, font or color to the surrounding text of lesser size.(2) Language in the body of a record or display:(i) greater in size than the surrounding text; and(ii) set off from surrounding text by any of the following in a manner that a reasonable person should notice the language:(A) contrasting type, font or color to the surrounding text;(B) contrasting background color to the surrounding text; or(C) symbols or other marks that call attention to the language.* * *Section 2. Section 343(b) of the act is amended to read:Section 343. School district tax notices.* * *(b) Notice of [property tax relief] State Gaming Fund tax reduction.--A school district that implements homestead and farmstead exclusions shall include with the homestead or farmstead owner's tax bill a notice that the tax bill includes a homestead or farmstead exclusion in the amount identified under subsection (a). The notice shall at a minimum be conspicuous and take the following form:20250HB0325PN0507 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [NOTICE OF PROPERTY TAX RELIEFYour enclosed tax bill includes a tax reduction for your homestead and/or farmstead property. As an eligible homestead and/or farmstead property owner, you have received tax relief through a homestead and/or farmstead exclusion which has been provided under the Pennsylvania Taxpayer Relief Act, a law passed by the Pennsylvania General Assembly designed to reduce your property taxes.]STATE GAMING FUND TAX REDUCTION Your enclosed tax bill included a tax reduction of (amount of exclusion) for your property. This tax relief is mandated by law through an act of the Pennsylvania General Assembly which uses CASINO gaming revenue to reduce your property taxes. This reduction is separate from any action taken by your school district.Section 3. The addition of the definition of "conspicuous" in section 102 and the amendment of section 343(b) of the act shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0325PN0507 - 3 - <--12345678910111213141516171819